Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIV Public Utilities
Local Regulation of Taxicabs

281.910.
Local government authority over regulation of taxicabs — Adoption — Ordinance — Review by cabinet — Revocation of authority. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 274, § 9, effective July 15, 2002; repealed by 2015 ch. 19, § 45, effective June 24, 2015.

281.912.
Safety inspection — Proof — Safety and out-of-service criteria — Revocation for fraudulent inspection record. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 274, § 10, effective July 15, 2002; repealed by 2015 ch. 19, § 45, effective June 24, 2015.

281.914.
Existing certificate holders. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 274, § 11, effective July 15, 2002; repealed by 2015 ch. 19, § 45, effective June 24, 2015.